Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2604
Legislative findings and priorities.

The Legislature finds that since the majority of children of prekindergarten age will continue to be served in private child care settings and programs, an investment of public resources in upgrading the training levels of staff will be an investment in all the children of the state. Coordination of existing training opportunities offered by agencies would greatly enhance the ability of providers in local communities to gain access to relevant training and would also enhance efforts to provide training which is sensitive to local needs. The Legislature also finds that training which brings together staff from various programs can provide a setting in which to initiate and promote collaborative efforts at the local level.

The Legislature finds that the highest priority need for training is for family child care home providers.

The Legislature further finds that the funding provided by the federal Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 1990 will provide significant new funding to improve child care and early childhood education and school-age care in Nebraska.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 4.